Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 11. Replevin

§ 1-21-1101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2005,
ch. 90, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, Part I, § 106, provided that generally circuit courts have jurisdiction of actions for the recovery of specific personal property.

Laws 2005, ch. 90, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

§§ 1-21-1102 through 1-21-1116.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1987, ch. 198, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from C.L. 1876, ch. 71, part I, §§ 107 through 109 and 111 through 121, and Laws 1973, ch. 173, § 1, related to replevin. For present similar provisions, see §§

1-15-301

through

1-15-306

.